Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,157
Nail technology school license; renewal; inactive status.

The procedure for renewing a school license shall be in accordance with section 38-143, except that in addition to all other requirements, the nail technology school shall receive a satisfactory rating on an accreditation inspection conducted by the department within the six months immediately prior to the date of license renewal.

Any nail technology school not able to meet the requirements for license renewal shall have its license placed on inactive status until all deficiencies have been corrected, and the school shall not operate in any manner during the time its license is inactive. If the deficiencies are not corrected within six months after the date of license renewal, the license may be revoked unless the department approves an extension of the time limit. The license of a school that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such school may reopen.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 77;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 96;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,228;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 419.